Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Mississippi State Guard

§ 33-5-51.
Organization of the State Guard.

The Governor is hereby authorized to organize, equip, train and maintain, in such strength and in such organized branches of the service as he may deem advisable, a military force similar to the National Guard and organized for the same purposes, to be known as the Mississippi State Guard, to be utilized in aid to or in lieu of the Mississippi National Guard upon its mobilization. The Governor may accept volunteers for the Mississippi State Guard in accordance with regulations promulgated by him and may use the provisions of Sections 33-5-1 through 33-5-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of providing personnel for such Mississippi State Guard. No person under the age of sixteen (16) years shall be eligible for service in the Mississippi State Guard. No person shall by reason of membership therein be exempt from military service under any federal law. The Mississippi State Guard shall be governed by the same laws and regulations so far as applicable, and shall be entitled to the same privileges, immunities and allowances, as may be now or hereafter provided for the Mississippi National Guard. When requested by the Adjutant General, the Legislature may appropriate funds for the support and operation of the Mississippi State Guard. If authorized by the federal laws such state guard shall be organized, maintained and trained under the provisions of any laws of the United States now or hereafter enacted for the organization, training and maintenance of state forces other than those of the National Guard.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-141; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 92; Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 33-5-53.
Equipping State Guard.

For the use of such State Guard, the Governor is hereby authorized to requisition from the department of defense of the United States such arms and equipment as may be in the possession of and can be spared by the department of defense. The Governor may make available to the Mississippi State Guard the facilities of state armories, their equipment, and such other public facilities and property as may be available and reasonably necessary for the maintenance of such Mississippi State Guard.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-142; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 93, eff from and after June 1, 1966.